District of Columbia statutes.
47-1061

Capitol Hill Community Garden Land Trust; lot 0109 in square 1100.

Upon the transfer of real property located at square 1100, lot 0109 to the Capitol Hill Community Garden Land Trust, the property shall be exempt from all taxation so long as the same is available for use by the public generally, not used for commercial purposes, and subject to the provisions of §§ 47-1005, 47-1007, and 47-1009 as if the exemption were granted administratively under this chapter.

Apr. 5, 2005, D.C. Law 15-284, § 2(b), 52 DCR 855

Sections 3 and 4 of D.C. Law 15-284 provided:

“Sec. 3. Equitable real property tax relief; exemption from transfer taxes, penalties, interest or fees.

“(a) The Council orders that all real property taxes, interest, penalties, fees, and other related charges assessed against real property located at square 1100, lot 0109, since October 1, 1994 through the first day of the month following the effective date of this act, be forgiven, and that any payment already made for this period be refunded; provided, that this property is owned by the Capitol Hill Community Garden Land Trust, available for use by the public generally, and not used for commercial purposes.

“(b) The one-time transfer of the property described in subsection (a) of this section to the Capitol Hill Community Garden Land Trust shall not be subject to any taxes, penalties, interest, or fees.

Section 7056 of D.C. Law 17-219 repealed section 4 of D.C. Law 15-284.